Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-305
Coupon bonds; record; duty of local board.

Every board issuing bonds under the provisions of sections 10-301 to 10-304 shall keep a complete record of all transactions connected therewith.

Laws 1903, c. 10, § 5, p. 64;

R.S.1913, § 404;

C.S.1922, § 321;

C.S.1929, § 11-305;

R.S.1943, § 10-305.